Utah statutes.
31A-17-504.   Computation of minimum standard.
Except as otherwise provided in Sections 31A-17-505, 31A-17-506, and
31A-17-513, the minimum standard for the valuation of all life insurance
policies and annuity and pure endowment contracts issued prior to January 1,
1994, shall be that provided by the laws in effect immediately prior to that
date. Except as otherwise provided in Sections 31A-17-505, 31A-17-506, and
31A-17-513, the minimum standard for the valuation of all such policies and
contracts issued on or after January 1, 1994, shall be the commissioner's
reserve valuation methods defined in Sections 31A-17-507, 31A-17-508,
31A-17-511, and 31A-17-513, 3.5% interest, or in the case of life insurance
policies and contracts, other than annuity and pure endowment contracts,
issued on or after June 1, 1973, 4% interest for such policies issued prior to
April 2, 1980, 5.5% interest for single premium life insurance policies, and
4.5% interest for all other such policies issued on and after April 2, 1980,
and the following tables:
(1)  For all ordinary policies of life insurance issued on the standard basis,
excluding any accident and health and accidental death benefits in such
policies: the National Association of Insurance Commissioners 1941 Standard
Ordinary Mortality Table for such policies issued prior to the operative date
of Subsection 31A-22-408(6)(a) (that is, the Standard Nonforfeiture Law for
Life Insurance), the National Association of Insurance Commissioners 1958
Standard Ordinary Mortality Table for such policies issued on or after the
operative date of Subsection 31A-22-408(6)(a) and prior to the operative date
of Subsection 31A-22-408(6)(d), provided that for any category of such
policies issued on female risks, all modified net premiums and present values
referred to in this section may be calculated according to an age not more
than six years younger than the actual age of the insured; and for such
policies issued on or after the operative date of Subsection 31A-22-408(6)(d):
(a)  the National Association of Insurance Commissioners 1980 Standard
Ordinary Mortality Table;
(b)  at the election of the company for any one or more specified plans of
life insurance, the National Association of Insurance Commissioners 1980
Standard Ordinary Mortality Table with Ten-Year Select Mortality Factors; or
(c)  any ordinary mortality table, adopted after 1980 by the National
Association of Insurance Commissioners, that is approved by rule promulgated
by the commissioner for use in determining the minimum standard of valuation
for such policies.
(2)  For all industrial life insurance policies issued on the standard basis,
excluding any accident and health and accidental death benefits in such
policies: the 1941 Standard Industrial Mortality Table for such policies
issued prior to the operative date of Subsection 31A-22-408(6)(c), and for
such policies issued on or after such operative date, the National Association
of Insurance Commissioners 1961 Standard Industrial Mortality Table or any
industrial mortality table, adopted after 1980 by the National Association of
Insurance Commissioners, that is approved by rule promulgated by the
commissioner for use in determining the minimum standard of valuation for such
policies.
(3)  For individual annuity and pure endowment contracts, excluding any
disability and accidental death benefits in such policies:
(a)  the 1937 Standard Annuity Mortality Table;
(b)  at the option of the company, the Annuity Mortality Table for 1949,
Ultimate; or
(c)  any modification of either of these tables approved by the commissioner.
(4)  For group annuity and pure endowment contracts, excluding any accident
and health and accidental death benefits in such policies:
(a)  the Group Annuity Mortality Table for 1951, any modification of such
table approved by the commissioner; or
(b)  at the option of the company, any of the tables or modifications of
tables specified for individual annuity and pure endowment contracts.
(5)  For total and permanent disability benefits in or supplementary to
ordinary policies or contracts: for policies or contracts issued on or after
January 1, 1966, the tables of Period 2 disablement rates and the 1930 to 1950
termination rates of the 1952 Disability Study of the Society of Actuaries,
with due regard to the type of benefit or any tables of disablement rates and
termination rates adopted after 1980 by the National Association of Insurance
Commissioners, that are approved by rule promulgated by the commissioner for
use in determining the minimum standard of valuation for such policies; for
policies or contracts issued on or after January 1, 1961, and prior to January
1, 1966, either such tables or, at the option of the company, the Class (3)
Disability Table (1926); and for policies issued prior to January 1, 1961, the
Class (3) Disability Table (1926). Any such table shall, for active lives, be
combined with a mortality table permitted for calculating the reserves for
life insurance policies.
(6)  For accidental death benefits in or supplementary to policies issued on
or after January 1, 1966, the 1959 Accidental Death Benefits Table or any
accidental death benefits table adopted after 1980 by the National Association
of Insurance Commissioners, that is approved by rule promulgated by the
commissioner for use in determining the minimum standard of valuation for such
policies, for policies issued on or after January 1, 1961, and prior to
January 1, 1966, either such table or, at the option of the company, the
Inter-Company Double Indemnity Mortality Table; and for policies issued prior
to January 1, 1961, the Inter-Company Double Indemnity Mortality Table. Either
table shall be combined with a mortality table for calculating the reserves
for life insurance policies.
(7)  For group life insurance, life insurance issued on the substandard basis
and other special benefits: such tables as may be approved by the
commissioner.
